Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1607
Semiannual statement; cost of publication; payment.

The county shall pay to the printer a reasonable compensation for the publication of such statement.

Laws 1883, c. 21, § 3, p. 182;

R.S.1913, § 5644;

C.S.1922, § 4971;

C.S.1929, § 26-1308;

R.S.1943, § 23-1607.